src/fst/lexicon.tmp.lexc
LEXICON NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG
@R.person.NULL@@D.sg@+Sg:@R.person.NULL@@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! No possession, no singular suffix
@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.A@+Sg:@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.A@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! No possession, a-singular (possessive suffix -im ruled out earlier)
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, im-poss, 0-singular
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.im.IM@@D.sg@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.im.IM@@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, 0-poss, 0-singular
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.im.IM@@R.sg.A@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.im.IM@@R.sg.A@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, 0-poss, a-singular

LEXICON NI_POSS_SUFFIXES
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0 NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0 NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg:@U.person.O@0   NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@                    NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@@U.poss.PL@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@@U.poss.PL@%>o2nnu2  NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@@U.poss.PL@+Px12Pl:@U.person.KI@@U.poss.PL@%>o2nnu2 NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@@U.poss.PL@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@@U.poss.PL@%>uwa  NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@@U.poss.PL@+Px3Pl:@U.person.O@@U.poss.PL@0%>uwa   NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Obviative possessor
@U.person.O@@U.poss.PL@+Px4Sg/Pl:@U.person.O@@U.poss.PL@%>i2yiw NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Unspecified possessor
@U.person.MI@+PxX:@U.person.MI@0        NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
NI_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2hk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2hk   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
! @U.person.NULL@                    NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2nâhk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px12Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2nâhk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2wâhk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@0%>i2wâhk   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
! Obviative possessor
@U.person.O@+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2yihk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
! Unspecified possessor
@U.person.MI@+PxX+Loc:@U.person.MI@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES
@D.number.PL@ NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG ; 
@D.number.SG@+Pl:@D.number.SG@%>o2l NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@R.person.NULL@+Loc:@R.person.NULL@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG
@D.sg@+Sg:@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Zero Sg morpheme for non NI-4w cases
@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! -i-singular (NI-4w), when no other morphology
@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@R.sg.I@0    NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! 0-singular (NI-4w), when -im-poss
@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@R.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@R.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! 0-singular (NI-4w), when singular possession and 0-im
@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@D.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@D.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! -i-singular (NI-4w), when singular possession and 0-im

! ----------
! Test cases for various noun stem types
! To eventually be moved to under: src/morphology/stems/nouns*.lexc
! ----------

! LEXICON N_INDEP_STEMS
! @U.im.NULL@ NA_0_STEMS ; ! NA stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! @U.im.IM@   NA_IM_STEMS ; ! NA stems that require -im in possession
! @U.im.NULL@ NI_0_STEMS ; ! NI stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! @U.im.IM@   NI_IM_STEMS ; ! NI stems that require -im in possession - likely do not exist
! 
! LEXICON NA_0_STEMS
! astotin NA ;
! 
! LEXICON NA_IM_STEMS
! âmow NA "bee" ;
! sîsîp NA "duck" ;
! 
! LEXICON NI_0_STEMS
! askiy NI "land" ;
! astotin NI "hat" ;
! mâcîs NI "camp" ;
!
! LEXICON NI_IM_STEMS
! xxx NI "yyy" ;
! xxx NI "yyy" ;

! LEXICON N_DEP_NONKIN_STEMS
! @U.im.NULL@ NAD_0_NONKIN_STEMS ; ! NAD stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! @U.im.NULL@ NID_0_NONKIN_STEMS ; ! NID stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! 
! LEXICON NAD_0_NONKIN_STEMS
! masakay:asakay NAD "skin" ;
! 
! LEXICON NID_0_NONKIN_STEMS
! mihtawakay:htawakay NID "ear" ;
! mispiton:spiton NID "arm" ;
!
! LEXICON N_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS
! @U.im.NULL@ NAD_0_KINSHIP_STEMS ; ! NAD stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! ! @U.im.NULL@ NI_0_KINSHIP_STEMS ; ! The are no NID kinship stems
!
! LEXICON NAD_0_KINSHIP_STEMS
! -ohkom:ohkom NAD "grand-mother" ;
! -ôhtawiy:ôhtawiy NAD "father" ;
! -tânis:tânis NAD "daughter, brother, sister" ;

!!! Alternative via setting flag-diacritics via case-specific continuation classes
! IM: default without -im, needs to be required.
! DIM: default with both -is and -isis, either one needs to be required

! NA 
! LEXICON NA_0
! @P.im.NULL@@P.is.IS@@P.isis.ISIS@ NA ;


LEXICON NOUN_IRREGULARS
! Irregular forms of ôsi
ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg:nitôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg:kitôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg:otôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl:nitôtinân OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px12Pl:kitôtinaw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl:kitôtiwâw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl:otôtiwâw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl:otôtiyiw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
! Locative combos
ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc:nitôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc:kitôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc:otôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc:nitôtinâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px12Pl+Loc:kitôtinâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc:kitôtiwâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc:otôtiwâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:otôtiyihk # ;
! Regular forms of atim, which cannot be possessed
! atim+N+A+Sg:atim # ;
! atim+N+A+Pl:atimwak # ;
! atim+N+A+Obv:atimwa # ;
! atim+N+A+Loc:atimohk # ;
! "Irregular" forms of atim, which are the ones that can be possessed
! @P.person.NI@atim+N+A:@P.person.NI@nitêm NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! @P.person.KI@atim+N+A:@P.person.KI@kitêm NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! @P.person.O@atim+N+A:@P.person.O@otêm NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON OSI_SUFFIXES
+Sg:0 # ;
+Pl:a # ;

! Case-specific continuation lexica for -im/0 and -is/-isis

LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM
@U.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@U.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM
@P.im.IM@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NA ;

! NI

LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM
@U.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@U.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM
@P.im.IM@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NI ;

! NAD 

LEXICON NAD_SG/A
@U.sg.A@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_SG/A_DIM/IS
@U.sg.A@ NAD_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM
@P.im.IM@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NAD ;

! NID

LEXICON NID_SG/I
@U.sg.I@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_SG/I_DIM/IS
@U.sg.I@ NID_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM
@P.im.IM@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NID ;

!! NOUN_ENDLEX for wrapping up various things

LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_STEMS
amisk:amiskw NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
asinîwâskahikan NI_DIM/IS ;
askâwi:askâw2 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
askihk:askihkw NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
atihk:atihkw NA_DIM/IS ;
aya:ay4 NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
ayapasinâstêwêkin:aýapasinâstêwêkinw NI_DIM/IS ;
ayi:ay4 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
âkayâsîwiyiniw:âkaýâsîwiýiniw NA_DIM/IS ;
âmow-mêyi:âmow-mêy4 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
âtawêyihtamowin:âtawêýihtamowin NI_DIM/IS ;
emqan NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
sihpacu NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ; 
puhtaya NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
possesomu2 NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
oposi NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
êsa:ês NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
êyiko-wîsti:êýiko-wîst NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
iskwêsisâpoy NI_DIM/IS ;
iskwêw NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
iskwêw-âya:iskwêw-ây4 NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
iskwêw-âyi:iskwêw-ây4 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
iyinito-kinosêw:iýinito-kinosêw NA_DIM/IS ;
kaskihowin NI_DIM/IS ;
kaskitêwi-maskwa:kaskitêwi-maskw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
kêhtê-aya:kêhtê-ay4 NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
kihci-mihti:kihci-miht NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
kihci-okimâskwêw NA_DIM/IS ;
kikawinamowin NI_DIM/IS ;
kisê-aya:kisê-ay4 NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
kiskisiwin NI_DIM/IS ;
kiyâskisk:kiýâskisk NA_DIM/IS ;
kîskâyowêwin:kîskâýowêwin NI_DIM/IS ;
kôna:kôn NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
macastêhamânakêwin NI_DIM/IS ;
maci-manitowi-mihko:maci-manitowi-mihkw2 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ; ! CHECK!
mahihkan NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
mahihkanis NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
mahihkaniwayân NA_DIM/IS ;
mahkêsîsi-wâti:mahkêsîsi-wât NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
maskawêkin:maskawêkinw NI_DIM/IS ;
maskwa:maskw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
mâskikan NI_DIM/IS ;
mihko:mihkw NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ; ! CHECK!
mihkokwan NA_DIM/IS ;
mihtikwan NI_DIM/IS ;
misi-sîsîp NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
misi-wâti:misi-wât NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
mistah-âya:mistah-ây4 NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
mistatimo-mêyi:mistatimo-mêy4 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
mistâkayâsiw:mistâkaýâsiw NA_DIM/IS ;
miyi:miý NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
miyo-kakêskihkêmowin:miýo-kakêskihkêmowin NI_DIM/IS ;
mostos:mostosw NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
môhcohkâsoskiwin NI_DIM/IS ;
môswa:môsw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
nanapakicihciy NA_DIM/IS ;
napakâ-sihta:napakâ-siht NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
nâpêw NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
nêhiyaw-mihko:nêhiýaw-mihkw NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ; ! CHECK!
niska:nisk NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
nitotamâwin NI_DIM/IS ;
nôsê-aya:nôsê-ay4 NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
nôsê-mistâhkêsiw NA_DIM/IS ;
okimâhkân NA_DIM/IS ;
omâmihkwêw NA_DIM/IS ;
opiminawasow NA_DIM/IS ;
oski-ôsi:oski-ôs NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
otapoyihkêw NA_DIM/IS ;
ôsi:ôs NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
pahkwêsikan NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
pakwac-âya:pakwac-ây4 NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
pasân NA_DIM/IS ;
paskwâwi-mostos:paskwâwi-mostosw NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
pâhpakowêwayân NI_DIM/IS ;
pâstâhowi-mihko:pâstâhowi-mihkw NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ; ! CHECK!
pêyakwahpicikêw-aya:pêyakwahpicikêw-ay4 NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
pîhtatwân NA_DIM/IS ;
pwâta:pwât NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
sihtapihkwan NA_DIM/IS ;
sisikopicikaniwiyâs NI_DIM/IS ;
sîsîp NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
sîsîp-wâwi:sîsîp-wâw2 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
tîwaskihk:tîwaskihkw NA_DIM/IS ;
wâhkwa:wâhkw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
wâkâyôsi-wâti:wâkâýôsi-wât NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
wâpamon NI_DIM/IS ;
wâpiski-maskwa:wâpiski-maskw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
wâwâskêsiw NA_DIM/IS ;
wîko:wîkw NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ; ! CHECK!
wîpi-maskwa:wîpi-maskw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS
nâskikan:âskikan NID_DIM/IS ;
nicâhkos:câhkos NAD_DIM/IS ;
niciskakisiy:ciskakisiy NID_DIM/IS ;
niciwâmiskwêm:ciwâmiskwêm NAD_DIM/IS ;
nicôcêmisis:côcêmisis NAD_DIM/IS ;
nikêhtê-ayim:kêhtê-ayim NAD_DIM/IS ;
nikohtaskway:kohtaskway NID_DIM/IS ;
nikwêmês:kwêmês NAD_DIM/IS ;
nimikiy:mikiy NID_DIM/IS ;
ninahâhkisîm:nahâhkisîm NAD_DIM/IS ;
nipêyakokosisân:pêyakokosisân NAD_DIM/IS ;
nipwâm:pwâm NID_DIM/IS ;
niskâhtikwanikan:skâhtikwanikan NID_DIM/IS ;
niskocâkâs:skocâkâs NID_DIM/IS ;
nispiton:spiton NID_DIM/IS ;
nistimihkâwin:stimihkâwin NAD_DIM/IS ;
nitayân:tayân NID_DIM/IS ;
nitânisihkawin:tânisihkawin NAD_DIM/IS ;
nitihkom:tihkom NAD_DIM/IS ;
nitihtiman:tihtiman NID_DIM/IS ;
nitîhiy:tîhiy NAD_DIM/IS ;
nitokanikan:tokanikan NID_DIM/IS ;
nitôskinîkiskwêm:tôskinîkiskwêm NAD_DIM/IS ;
niyihkos:iýihkos NAD_DIM/IS ;
nîci-kîhkâw-:îci-kîhkâw NAD_DIM/IS ;
nîki:îk NID_SG/I_DIM/IS ;
nîpit:îpit NID_DIM/IS ;
nîskwa:îskw NAD_SG/A_DIM/IS ;
nîtim:îtimw NAD_DIM/IS ;
nîwa:îw2 NAD_SG/A_DIM/IS ;
nôhtâwîhkâwin:ohtâwîhkâwin NAD_DIM/IS ;
wîwa:îw2 NAD_SG/A_DIM/IS ;
LEXICON NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_STEMS
mahkwan:ahkwan NID_DIM/IS ;
mâskikan:âskikan NID_DIM/IS ;
mikohtaskway:kohtaskway NID_DIM/IS ;
miskâtikan:skâtikan NID_DIM/IS ;
mistikwânikan:stikwânikan NID_DIM/IS ;
mitakikom:takikom NAD_DIM/IS ;
mitisiy:tisiy NID_DIM/IS ;
mitisoway:tisoway NAD_DIM/IS ;
